Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.180

Inspection board—Creation—Duties—Powers.

If a horticultural inspector finds premises or property infected, he or she shall make a written report thereof to the inspector-at-large in his or her district stating the disease or infestation found, the estimated extent thereof, and whether in his or her opinion it is or will become a nuisance. Upon receipt of the report the inspector-at-large shall appoint a person residing within three miles of the said premises or property and who is a grower of horticultural products which could be infected from said premises or property, and who, with the inspector-at-large or someone delegated by him or her from his or her department, shall appoint a third person likewise a grower of agricultural products which could be so infected. Said three persons shall constitute an inspection board whose duty shall be to forthwith examine the infested premises or property so as to determine whether same or any part thereof is infested with any pest or disease named in RCW 15.08.010.

The board members shall have the same power of entry and inspection as the director, supervisor, or horticultural inspector and shall be compensated at the rate of four dollars per day to be paid from the county current expense budget for horticulture.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6014; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.180. Prior: (i) 1941 c 20 s 5; 1915 c 166 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2849-1e. (ii) 1941 c 20 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2849-1g, part.]